District of Columbia statutes.
19-1108

General powers of custodial trustee.

(a)

A custodial trustee, acting in a fiduciary capacity, has all the rights and powers over custodial trust property which an unmarried adult owner has over individually owned property, but a custodial trustee may exercise those rights and powers in a fiduciary capacity only.

(b)

This section does not relieve a custodial trustee from liability for a violation of section 19-1107.

July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-177, § 2(b), 49 DCR 5092
This section is referenced in § 19-1106.